Nebraska, session 109, LB271.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB271 LB271
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 28-101, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-101 Sections 28-101 to 28-1357, 28-1601 to 28-1603, and 28-1701
and section 2 of this act shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska
Criminal Code.
Sec. 2. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Interfere means to tamper with, displace, remove, damage,
disable, destroy, set fire to, impair, or otherwise interfere with
something; and
(b) Rail infrastructure means any of the following that are located
on railroad property or are owned, leased, possessed, operated, or
otherwise used for or in connection with railroad operations: A train,
locomotive, freight or passenger car, or any other on-track vehicle or
equipment; any railroad track or structure; any signalling or
communication system or component; or any station, terminal, depot, or
other facility.
(2) A person commits an offense if such person knowingly, willfully,
or recklessly, and without lawful authority or permission:
(a) Places any obstruction upon or within or otherwise interferes
with any rail or any part of the tracks, ties, switches, ballast, or
other fixture or device, or the securement thereof, or any bridge,
tunnel, viaduct, tower, culvert, drain, trestle, embankment, parapet, or
other structure or any part thereof, attached to or connected to or used
with such tracks or the operation of any railroad;
(b) Interferes with any signal, mechanism, device, equipment,
bungalow, communication lines or antennas, or other appurtenance used in
or with, or controlling the signal or communication systems of, any
railroad, including any train control system, centralized dispatching
system, wayside detector, communication tower, buried or aerial facility,
or highway-rail grade crossing warning system;
(c) Interferes with, or places or releases a biological agent or
-2-

LB271 LB271
2025 2025
toxin, destructive substance, or destructive device in, upon, near, or on
board any rail infrastructure;
(d) Detaches, initiates an emergency brake application of, or
otherwise interferes with the movement of, any train, locomotive, freight
or passenger car, or any other on-track vehicle or equipment;
(e) Assaults or injures any rail passenger, railroad employee, or
police officer of a railroad or any person on or within any railroad
property;
(f) Makes a terroristic threat or knowingly conveys false
information or reports regarding an attempt or alleged attempt to commit
any of the acts described in this subsection; or
(g) Attempts, threatens, or conspires with others to commit any of
the acts described in this subsection.
(3) A violation of this section is a Class IIIA felony.
Sec. 3. Original section 28-101, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-3-